Washington statutes.
RCW 3.72.010

Youth court creation—Jurisdiction.

(1) A court created under chapter 3.30, 3.46, 3.50, or 35.20 RCW may create a youth court. The youth court shall have jurisdiction over civil, traffic, and transit infractions alleged to have been committed by juveniles age sixteen or seventeen. The court may refer a juvenile to the youth court upon request of any party or upon its own motion. However, a juvenile shall not be required under this section to have his or her civil, traffic, or transit infraction referred to or disposed of by a youth court.

(2) To be referred to a youth court pursuant to this chapter, a juvenile:

(a) May not be under the jurisdiction of any court for a civil infraction or for a violation of any provision of Title 46 RCW or for unlawful transit conduct under RCW 9.91.025;

(b) May not have any convictions for a violation of any provision of Title 46 RCW or for unlawful transit conduct under RCW 9.91.025; and

(c) Must acknowledge that there is a high likelihood that he or she would be found to have committed the civil, traffic, or transit infraction.

(3)(a) Nothing in this chapter shall interfere with the ability of juvenile courts to refer matters to youth courts that have been established to provide a diversion for matters involving juvenile offenders who are eligible for diversion pursuant to RCW 13.40.070 (6) and (8) and who agree, along with a parent, guardian, or legal custodian, to comply with the provisions of RCW 13.40.600.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall interfere with the ability of student courts to work with students who violate school rules and policies pursuant to RCW 28A.300.420.

(4) A youth court under this chapter may accept referrals of traffic infractions, transit infractions, and civil infractions committed by juveniles age twelve through fifteen from a juvenile court diversion unit under RCW 13.40.250(5), provided that the youth court follows all conditions of RCW 13.40.250(5). In this circumstance, the youth court shall maintain concurrent jurisdiction with the juvenile court only for the purpose of supervision of the diversion agreement.

[ 2020 c 191 s 2; 2017 c 9 s 2; 2005 c 73 s 1; 2002 c 237 s 2.]

NOTES: